Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-706
Sections, how construed.

The provisions of sections 13-701 to 13-706, in the event they shall be employed, shall control and take precedence over any provision of any other law, charter, ordinance, or regulation to the contrary or in conflict therewith; Provided, that nothing herein shall be construed as contravening, suspending, or otherwise affecting any provision of the Constitution of Nebraska or laws of this state, or of any local charter or other corporate articles or instrument of the political subdivision concerned, relating to the permanent relocation of any local seat of government.

Laws 1959, c. 92, § 6, p. 405;

Laws 1972, LB 1048, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2106.